Hawaii statutes.
§431:4-106 Board of directors. The
board of directors of a domestic insurer shall consist of not less than five
individuals, at least three-fourths of the individuals shall be United States
citizens, and a majority of the individuals shall be residents of this State.
[L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next